North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-67 Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 589, § 9]

Effective Date.

The repeal of this chapter by section 9 of chapter 589, S.L. 2009 became effective April 22, 2009, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 10 of chapter 589, S.L. 2009.

15-67-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 589, § 9.

15-67-02.
Appropriation of appreciation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 589, § 9.

15-67-03.
Rule of construction. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 589, § 9.

15-67-04.
Investment authority. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 589, § 9.

15-67-05.
Delegation of investment management. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 589, § 9.

15-67-06.
Standard of conduct. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 589, § 9.

15-67-07.
Release of restrictions on use or investment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 589, § 9.

15-67-08.
Uniformity of application and construction. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 589, § 9.

15-67-09.
Short title. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 589, § 9.